Illinois, session 104th, SB286.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Sex Offender Registration Act is amended by 5changing Section 2 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 150/2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 222)7    Sec. 2. Definitions. 8    (A) As used in this Article, "sex offender" means any 9person who is:10        (1) charged pursuant to Illinois law, or any 11    substantially similar federal, Uniform Code of Military 12    Justice, sister state, or foreign country law, with a sex 13    offense set forth in subsection (B) of this Section or the 14    attempt to commit an included sex offense, and:15            (a) is convicted of such offense or an attempt to 16        commit such offense; or17            (b) is found not guilty by reason of insanity of 18        such offense or an attempt to commit such offense; or19            (c) is found not guilty by reason of insanity 20        pursuant to Section 104-25(c) of the Code of Criminal 21        Procedure of 1963 of such offense or an attempt to 22        commit such offense; or23            (d) is the subject of a finding not resulting in an   SB0286- 2 -LRB104 03886 RLC 13910 b1        acquittal at a hearing conducted pursuant to Section 2        104-25(a) of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 3        for the alleged commission or attempted commission of 4        such offense; or5            (e) is found not guilty by reason of insanity 6        following a hearing conducted pursuant to a federal, 7        Uniform Code of Military Justice, sister state, or 8        foreign country law substantially similar to Section 9        104-25(c) of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 of 10        such offense or of the attempted commission of such 11        offense; or12            (f) is the subject of a finding not resulting in an 13        acquittal at a hearing conducted pursuant to a 14        federal, Uniform Code of Military Justice, sister 15        state, or foreign country law substantially similar to 16        Section 104-25(a) of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 17        1963 for the alleged violation or attempted commission 18        of such offense; or19        (2) declared as a sexually dangerous person pursuant 20    to the Illinois Sexually Dangerous Persons Act, or any 21    substantially similar federal, Uniform Code of Military 22    Justice, sister state, or foreign country law; or23        (3) subject to the provisions of Section 2 of the 24    Interstate Agreements on Sexually Dangerous Persons Act; 25    or26        (4) found to be a sexually violent person pursuant to   SB0286- 3 -LRB104 03886 RLC 13910 b1    the Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or any 2    substantially similar federal, Uniform Code of Military 3    Justice, sister state, or foreign country law; or4        (5) adjudicated a juvenile delinquent as the result of 5    committing or attempting to commit an act which, if 6    committed by an adult, would constitute any of the 7    offenses specified in item (B), (C), or (C-5) of this 8    Section or a violation of any substantially similar 9    federal, Uniform Code of Military Justice, sister state, 10    or foreign country law, or found guilty under Article V of 11    the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 of committing or attempting 12    to commit an act which, if committed by an adult, would 13    constitute any of the offenses specified in item (B), (C), 14    or (C-5) of this Section or a violation of any 15    substantially similar federal, Uniform Code of Military 16    Justice, sister state, or foreign country law.17    Convictions that result from or are connected with the 18same act, or result from offenses committed at the same time, 19shall be counted for the purpose of this Article as one 20conviction. Any conviction set aside pursuant to law is not a 21conviction for purposes of this Article.22     For purposes of this Section, "convicted" shall have the 23same meaning as "adjudicated".24    (B) As used in this Article, "sex offense" means:25        (1) A violation of any of the following Sections of 26    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012:  SB0286- 4 -LRB104 03886 RLC 13910 b1            11-20.1 (child pornography),2            11-20.1B or 11-20.3 (aggravated child 3        pornography), 4            11-6 (indecent solicitation of a child),5            11-9.1 (sexual exploitation of a child),6            11-9.2 (custodial sexual misconduct), 7            11-9.5 (sexual misconduct with a person with a 8        disability), 9            11-14.4 (promoting juvenile prostitution), 10            11-15.1 (soliciting for a juvenile prostitute),11            11-18.1 (patronizing a juvenile prostitute),12            11-17.1 (keeping a place of juvenile 13        prostitution),14            11-19.1 (juvenile pimping),15            11-19.2 (exploitation of a child), 16            11-25 (grooming), 17            11-26 (traveling to meet a minor or traveling to 18        meet a child), 19            11-1.20 or 12-13 (criminal sexual assault), 20            11-1.30 or 12-14 (aggravated criminal sexual 21        assault),22            11-1.40 or 12-14.1 (predatory criminal sexual 23        assault of a child),24            11-1.50 or 12-15 (criminal sexual abuse),25            11-1.60 or 12-16 (aggravated criminal sexual 26        abuse),  SB0286- 5 -LRB104 03886 RLC 13910 b1            12-33 (ritualized abuse of a child).2            An attempt to commit any of these offenses.3        (1.5) A violation of any of the following Sections of 4    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 5    when the victim is a person under 18 years of age, the 6    defendant is not a parent of the victim, the offense was 7    sexually motivated as defined in Section 10 of the Sex 8    Offender Evaluation and Treatment Act, and the offense was 9    committed on or after January 1, 1996:10            10-1 (kidnapping),11            10-2 (aggravated kidnapping),12            10-3 (unlawful restraint),13            10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful restraint).14        If the offense was committed before January 1, 1996, 15    it is a sex offense requiring registration only when the 16    person is convicted of any felony after July 1, 2011, and 17    paragraph (2.1) of subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act 18    applies. 19        (1.6) First degree murder under Section 9-1 of the 20    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 21    provided the offense was sexually motivated as defined in 22    Section 10 of the Sex Offender Management Board Act.23        (1.7) (Blank).24        (1.8) A violation or attempted violation of Section 25    11-11 (sexual relations within families) of the Criminal 26    Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, and the offense   SB0286- 6 -LRB104 03886 RLC 13910 b1    was committed on or after June 1, 1997. If the offense was 2    committed before June 1, 1997, it is a sex offense 3    requiring registration only when the person is convicted 4    of any felony after July 1, 2011, and paragraph (2.1) of 5    subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act applies. 6        (1.9) Child abduction under paragraph (10) of 7    subsection (b) of Section 10-5 of the Criminal Code of 8    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 committed by luring or 9    attempting to lure a child under the age of 16 into a motor 10    vehicle, building, house trailer, or dwelling place 11    without the consent of the parent or lawful custodian of 12    the child for other than a lawful purpose and the offense 13    was committed on or after January 1, 1998, provided the 14    offense was sexually motivated as defined in Section 10 of 15    the Sex Offender Management Board Act. If the offense was 16    committed before January 1, 1998, it is a sex offense 17    requiring registration only when the person is convicted 18    of any felony after July 1, 2011, and paragraph (2.1) of 19    subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act applies. 20        (1.10) A violation or attempted violation of any of 21    the following Sections of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 22    Criminal Code of 2012 when the offense was committed on or 23    after July 1, 1999:24            10-4 (forcible detention, if the victim is under 25        18 years of age), provided the offense was sexually 26        motivated as defined in Section 10 of the Sex Offender   SB0286- 7 -LRB104 03886 RLC 13910 b1        Management Board Act,2            11-6.5 (indecent solicitation of an adult),3            11-14.3 that involves soliciting for a prostitute, 4        or 11-15 (soliciting for a prostitute, if the victim 5        is under 18 years of age),6            subdivision (a)(2)(A) or (a)(2)(B) of Section 7        11-14.3, or Section 11-16 (pandering, if the victim is 8        under 18 years of age),9            11-18 (patronizing a prostitute, if the victim is 10        under 18 years of age),11            subdivision (a)(2)(C) of Section 11-14.3, or 12        Section 11-19 (pimping, if the victim is under 18 13        years of age).14        If the offense was committed before July 1, 1999, it 15    is a sex offense requiring registration only when the 16    person is convicted of any felony after July 1, 2011, and 17    paragraph (2.1) of subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act 18    applies. 19        (1.11) A violation or attempted violation of any of 20    the following Sections of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 21    Criminal Code of 2012 when the offense was committed on or 22    after August 22, 2002:23            11-9 or 11-30 (public indecency for a third or 24        subsequent conviction).25        If the third or subsequent conviction was imposed 26    before August 22, 2002, it is a sex offense requiring   SB0286- 8 -LRB104 03886 RLC 13910 b1    registration only when the person is convicted of any 2    felony after July 1, 2011, and paragraph (2.1) of 3    subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act applies. 4        (1.12) A violation or attempted violation of Section 5    5.1 of the Wrongs to Children Act or Section 11-9.1A of the 6    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 7    (permitting sexual abuse) when the offense was committed 8    on or after August 22, 2002. If the offense was committed 9    before August 22, 2002, it is a sex offense requiring 10    registration only when the person is convicted of any 11    felony after July 1, 2011, and paragraph (2.1) of 12    subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act applies. 13        (1.13) A violation of paragraph (6) of subsection (a) 14    of Section 19-6 of the Criminal Code of 2012 (home 15    invasion in which the defendant commits against any person 16    or persons within the dwelling place criminal sexual 17    assault, aggravated criminal sexual assault, predatory 18    criminal sexual assault of a child, criminal sexual abuse, 19    or aggravated criminal sexual abuse). 20        (2) A violation of any former law of this State 21    substantially equivalent to any offense listed in 22    subsection (B) of this Section.23    (C) A conviction for an offense of federal law, Uniform 24Code of Military Justice, or the law of another state or a 25foreign country that is substantially equivalent to any 26offense listed in subsections (B), (C), (E), and (E-5) of this   SB0286- 9 -LRB104 03886 RLC 13910 b1Section shall constitute a conviction for the purpose of this 2Article. A finding or adjudication as a sexually dangerous 3person or a sexually violent person under any federal law, 4Uniform Code of Military Justice, or the law of another state 5or foreign country that is substantially equivalent to the 6Sexually Dangerous Persons Act or the Sexually Violent Persons 7Commitment Act shall constitute an adjudication for the 8purposes of this Article.9    (C-5) A person at least 17 years of age at the time of the 10commission of the offense who is convicted of first degree 11murder under Section 9-1 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 12Criminal Code of 2012, against a person under 18 years of age, 13shall be required to register for natural life. A conviction 14for an offense of federal, Uniform Code of Military Justice, 15sister state, or foreign country law that is substantially 16equivalent to any offense listed in subsection (C-5) of this 17Section shall constitute a conviction for the purpose of this 18Article. This subsection (C-5) applies to a person who 19committed the offense before June 1, 1996 if: (i) the person is 20incarcerated in an Illinois Department of Corrections facility 21on August 20, 2004 (the effective date of Public Act 93-977), 22or (ii) subparagraph (i) does not apply and the person is 23convicted of any felony after July 1, 2011, and paragraph 24(2.1) of subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act applies.25    (C-6) A person who is convicted or adjudicated delinquent 26of first degree murder as defined in Section 9-1 of the   SB0286- 10 -LRB104 03886 RLC 13910 b1Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, against a 2person 18 years of age or over, shall be required to register 3for his or her natural life. A conviction for an offense of 4federal, Uniform Code of Military Justice, sister state, or 5foreign country law that is substantially equivalent to any 6offense listed in subsection (C-6) of this Section shall 7constitute a conviction for the purpose of this Article. This 8subsection (C-6) does not apply to those individuals released 9from incarceration more than 10 years prior to January 1, 2012 10(the effective date of Public Act 97-154). 11    (D) As used in this Article, "law enforcement agency 12having jurisdiction" means the Chief of Police in each of the 13municipalities in which the sex offender expects to reside, 14work, or attend school (1) upon his or her discharge, parole or 15release or (2) during the service of his or her sentence of 16probation or conditional discharge, or the Sheriff of the 17county, in the event no Police Chief exists or if the offender 18intends to reside, work, or attend school in an unincorporated 19area. "Law enforcement agency having jurisdiction" includes 20the location where out-of-state students attend school and 21where out-of-state employees are employed or are otherwise 22required to register.23    (D-1) As used in this Article, "supervising officer" means 24the assigned Illinois Department of Corrections parole agent 25or county probation officer. 26    (E) As used in this Article, "sexual predator" means any   SB0286- 11 -LRB104 03886 RLC 13910 b1person who, after July 1, 1999, is:2        (1) Convicted for an offense of federal, Uniform Code 3    of Military Justice, sister state, or foreign country law 4    that is substantially equivalent to any offense listed in 5    subsection (E) or (E-5) of this Section shall constitute a 6    conviction for the purpose of this Article. Convicted of a 7    violation or attempted violation of any of the following 8    Sections of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code 9    of 2012:10            10-5.1 (luring of a minor),11            11-14.4 that involves keeping a place of juvenile 12        prostitution, or 11-17.1 (keeping a place of juvenile 13        prostitution),14            subdivision (a)(2) or (a)(3) of Section 11-14.4, 15        or Section 11-19.1 (juvenile pimping),16            subdivision (a)(4) of Section 11-14.4, or Section 17        11-19.2 (exploitation of a child),18            11-20.1 (child pornography),19            11-20.1B or 11-20.3 (aggravated child 20        pornography),21            11-1.20 or 12-13 (criminal sexual assault),22            11-1.30 or 12-14 (aggravated criminal sexual 23        assault),24            11-1.40 or 12-14.1 (predatory criminal sexual 25        assault of a child),26            11-1.60 or 12-16 (aggravated criminal sexual   SB0286- 12 -LRB104 03886 RLC 13910 b1        abuse),2            12-33 (ritualized abuse of a child);3        (2) (blank);4        (3) declared as a sexually dangerous person pursuant 5    to the Sexually Dangerous Persons Act or any substantially 6    similar federal, Uniform Code of Military Justice, sister 7    state, or foreign country law;8        (4) found to be a sexually violent person pursuant to 9    the Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or any 10    substantially similar federal, Uniform Code of Military 11    Justice, sister state, or foreign country law;12        (5) convicted of a second or subsequent offense which 13    requires registration pursuant to this Act. For purposes 14    of this paragraph (5), "convicted" shall include a 15    conviction under any substantially similar Illinois, 16    federal, Uniform Code of Military Justice, sister state, 17    or foreign country law;18        (6) (blank); or19        (7) if the person was convicted of an offense set 20    forth in this subsection (E) on or before July 1, 1999, the 21    person is a sexual predator for whom registration is 22    required only when the person is convicted of a felony 23    offense after July 1, 2011, and paragraph (2.1) of 24    subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act applies. 25    (E-5) As used in this Article, "sexual predator" also 26means a person convicted of a violation or attempted violation   SB0286- 13 -LRB104 03886 RLC 13910 b1of any of the following Sections of the Criminal Code of 1961 2or the Criminal Code of 2012: 3        (1) Section 9-1 (first degree murder, when the victim 4    was a person under 18 years of age and the defendant was at 5    least 17 years of age at the time of the commission of the 6    offense, provided the offense was sexually motivated as 7    defined in Section 10 of the Sex Offender Management Board 8    Act);9        (2) Section 11-9.5 (sexual misconduct with a person 10    with a disability);11        (3) when the victim is a person under 18 years of age, 12    the defendant is not a parent of the victim, the offense 13    was sexually motivated as defined in Section 10 of the Sex 14    Offender Management Board Act, and the offense was 15    committed on or after January 1, 1996: (A) Section 10-1 16    (kidnapping), (B) Section 10-2 (aggravated kidnapping), 17    (C) Section 10-3 (unlawful restraint), and (D) Section 18    10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful restraint); and19        (4) Section 10-5(b)(10) (child abduction committed by 20    luring or attempting to lure a child under the age of 16 21    into a motor vehicle, building, house trailer, or dwelling 22    place without the consent of the parent or lawful 23    custodian of the child for other than a lawful purpose and 24    the offense was committed on or after January 1, 1998, 25    provided the offense was sexually motivated as defined in 26    Section 10 of the Sex Offender Management Board Act).  SB0286- 14 -LRB104 03886 RLC 13910 b1    (E-10) As used in this Article, "sexual predator" also 2means a person required to register in another State due to a 3conviction, adjudication or other action of any court 4triggering an obligation to register as a sex offender, sexual 5predator, or substantially similar status under the laws of 6that State. 7    (F) As used in this Article, "out-of-state student" means 8any sex offender, as defined in this Section, or sexual 9predator who is enrolled in Illinois, on a full-time or 10part-time basis, in any public or private educational 11institution, including, but not limited to, any secondary 12school, trade or professional institution, or institution of 13higher learning.14    (G) As used in this Article, "out-of-state employee" means 15any sex offender, as defined in this Section, or sexual 16predator who works in Illinois, regardless of whether the 17individual receives payment for services performed, for a 18period of time of 10 or more days or for an aggregate period of 19time of 30 or more days during any calendar year. Persons who 20operate motor vehicles in the State accrue one day of 21employment time for any portion of a day spent in Illinois.22    (H) As used in this Article, "school" means any public or 23private educational institution, including, but not limited 24to, any elementary or secondary school, trade or professional 25institution, or institution of higher education.26    (I) As used in this Article, "fixed residence" means any   SB0286- 15 -LRB104 03886 RLC 13910 b1and all places that a sex offender resides for an aggregate 2period of time of 5 or more days in a calendar year. 3    (J) As used in this Article, "Internet protocol address" 4means the string of numbers by which a location on the Internet 5is identified by routers or other computers connected to the 6Internet.7(Source: P.A. 100-428, eff. 1-1-18.)